Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-248
General penalty provision.

Any person violating any of the provisions of the Game Law or any provisions of the rules or regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission, where a penalty is not otherwise fixed, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be subject to a mandatory fine of at least fifty dollars upon conviction.

Laws 1943, c. 94, § 14, p. 331;

R.S.1943, § 37-103;

Laws 1957, c. 139, § 2, p. 465;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 172;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-103;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 58;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 12.